Louisiana, session 2026, HB876.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:4752 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4752. Privilege on net proceeds collected from third party in favor of medical
providers for services and supplies furnished injured persons
A. A health care healthcare provider, hospital, or ambulance service that
furnishes services or supplies to any injured person shall have a privilege for the
reasonable charges or fees of such health care healthcare provider, hospital, or
ambulance service on the net amount payable to the injured person, his heirs, or legal
representatives, out of the total amount of any recovery or sum had, collected, or to
be collected, whether by judgment or by settlement or compromise, from another
person on account of such injuries, and on the net amount payable by any insurance
company under any contract providing for indemnity or compensation to the injured
person. The privilege of an attorney shall have precedence over the privilege created
under this Section.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1089 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 876
B. A healthcare provider, hospital, or ambulance service shall be responsible
for up to twenty percent of litigation costs, as ordered by the court.